Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 27. Mississippi Justice Information Center

§ 45-27-1.
Legislative findings and declaration of purpose.

The Legislature finds and declares that a more effective administrative structure now is required to control the collection, storage, dissemination and use of criminal offender record information. These improvements in the organization and control of criminal offender record keeping are imperative both to strengthen the administration of criminal justice and to assure appropriate protection of rights of individual privacy. The purposes of this chapter are (a) to control and coordinate criminal offender record keeping within this state; (b) to assure periodic reporting to the Governor and Legislature concerning such record keeping; and (c) to establish a more effective administrative structure for the collection, maintenance, retrieval and dissemination of criminal history record information described in this chapter, consistent with those principles of scope and security prescribed by this chapter, and to facilitate the practical use of criminal offender record information within the criminal justice system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 13; Laws, 2007, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 45-27-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section unless the context requires otherwise:

“Criminal justice agencies” means public agencies at all levels of government which perform as their principal function activities relating to the apprehension, prosecution, adjudication or rehabilitation of criminal offenders.

“Offense” means an act which is a felony or a misdemeanor.

“Justice information system” means those agencies, procedures, mechanisms, media and forms, as well as the information itself, which are or become involved in the origination, transmittal, storage, retrieval and dissemination of information related to reported offenses and offenders, and the subsequent actions related to the events or persons.

“Criminal justice information” means the following classes of information:

“Secret data,” which includes information dealing with those elements of the operation and programming of the Mississippi Justice Information Center computer system and the communications network and satellite computer systems handling criminal justice information which prevents unlawful intrusion into the system.

“Criminal history record information,” which means information collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, affidavits, information or other formal charges and any disposition arising therefrom, sentencing, correctional supervision and release. The term does not include identification information such as fingerprint records or images to the extent that the information does not indicate involvement of the individual in the criminal justice system.

“Sensitive data,” which contains statistical information in the form of reports, lists and documentation which may identify a group characteristic, such as “white” males or “stolen” guns.

“Restricted data,” which contains information relating to data-gathering techniques, distribution methods, manuals and forms.

“Law enforcement agency” or “originating agency” or “agency” which includes a governmental unit or agency composed of one or more persons employed full time or part time by the state as a political subdivision thereof for the following purposes: (A) the administration of criminal justice, which includes the prevention and detection of crime; the apprehension, pretrial release, post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders; or the collection, storage and dissemination of criminal history record information; or (B) the enforcement of state laws or local ordinances, which includes making arrests for crimes while acting within the scope of their authority. The agency must perform one or more of the above-described criminal justice duties and allocate a substantial part of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice.

“Center” means the Mississippi Justice Information Center or the Mississippi Criminal Information Center.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Public Safety.

“Conviction information” means criminal history record information disclosing that a person was found guilty of, or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, a criminal offense in a court of law, together with any sentencing information. This includes a conviction in a federal or military tribunal, including a court martial conducted by the Armed Forces of the United States, or a conviction for an offense committed on an Indian Reservation or other federal property, or any court of a state of the United States.

“Nonconviction information” means arrest without disposition information if an interval of one (1) year has elapsed from the date of arrest and no active prosecution for the charge is pending, as well as all acquittals and all dismissals.

“Arrest card” means the initial law enforcement agency documentation of an arrest, whether in physical or digital form, including fingerprint information.

“Disposition form” means the form prescribed by rule of the Justice Information Center for a court or law enforcement agency to report the disposition of the case of a person who has been arrested.

“Disposition” means the outcome of the case of a person who was arrested and includes, without limitation:

Nonadjudication;

A verdict or plea of guilt;

A plea of nolo contendere;

A verdict of not guilty;

Dismissal;

Nolle prosequi;

Remand to the file;

Expunction; or

An appeal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 14; Laws, 2014, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 45-27-5.
Mississippi Justice Information System established; director; personnel.

There is hereby established within the Mississippi Department of Public Safety a system for the communication of vital information relating to crimes, criminals and criminal activity to be known as the Mississippi Justice Information Center. Central responsibility for the development, maintenance and operation of the center shall be vested with the director of the Mississippi Justice Information Center.

The director of the center shall maintain the necessary staff to enable the effective and efficient performance of the duties and responsibilities ascribed to the center. Such staff shall include but not be limited to statistical analysis personnel and field monitoring personnel, along with the support services to be procured within state government.

All personnel of the center shall be subject to approval by the state personnel board, with due recognition to be given to the special qualifications and availability of the types of individuals required for such employment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 3, eff from and after June 30, 1983.

§ 45-27-7.
Duties and functions of the Justice Information Center.

The Mississippi Justice Information Center shall:

Develop, operate and maintain an information system which will support the collection, storage, retrieval and dissemination of all data described in this chapter, consistent with those principles of scope, security and responsiveness prescribed by this chapter.

Cooperate with all criminal justice agencies within the state in providing those forms, procedures, standards and related training assistance necessary for the uniform operation of the statewide center.

Offer assistance and, when practicable, instruction to all local law enforcement agencies in establishing efficient local records systems.

Make available, upon request, to all local and state criminal justice agencies, to all federal criminal justice agencies and to criminal justice agencies in other states any information in the files of the center which will aid such agencies in the performance of their official duties. For this purpose the center shall operate on a twenty-four-hour basis, seven (7) days a week. Such information, when authorized by the director of the center, may also be made available to any other agency of this state or any political subdivision thereof and to any federal agency, upon assurance by the agency concerned that the information is to be used for official purposes only in the prevention or detection of crime or the apprehension of criminal offenders.

Cooperate with other agencies of this state, the crime information agencies of other states, and the national crime information center systems of the Federal Bureau of Investigation in developing and conducting an interstate, national and international system of criminal identification and records.

Make available, upon request, to nongovernmental entities or employers certain information for noncriminal justice purposes as specified in Section 45-27-12.

Institute necessary measures in the design, implementation and continued operation of the justice information system to ensure the privacy and security of the system. Such measures shall include establishing complete control over use of and access to the system and restricting its integral resources and facilities and those either possessed or procured and controlled by criminal justice agencies. Such security measures must meet standards developed by the center as well as those set by the nationally operated systems for interstate sharing of information.

Provide data processing for files listing motor vehicle drivers’ license numbers, motor vehicle registration numbers, wanted and stolen motor vehicles, outstanding warrants, identifiable stolen property and such other files as may be of general assistance to law enforcement agencies; provided, however, that the purchase, lease, rental or acquisition in any manner of “computer equipment or services,” as defined in Section 25-53-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be subject to the approval of the Mississippi Information Technology Services.

Maintain a field coordination and support unit which shall have all the power conferred by law upon any peace officer of this state.

The department, including the investigative division or the center, may:

Obtain and store fingerprints, descriptions, photographs and any other pertinent identifying data from crime scenes and on persons who:

1. For an offense which is a felony;

2. For an offense which is a misdemeanor;

3. As a fugitive from justice; or

Have been or are hereafter arrested or taken into custody in this state:

Are or become habitual offenders; or

Are currently or become confined to any prison, penitentiary or other penal institution; or

Are unidentified human corpses found in the state; or

Have submitted fingerprints for conducting criminal history record checks.

Compare all fingerprint and other identifying data received with that already on file and determine whether or not a criminal record is found for such person, and at once inform the requesting agency or arresting officer of those facts that may be disseminated consistent with applicable security and privacy laws and regulations. A record shall be maintained for a minimum of one (1) year of the dissemination of each individual criminal history, including at least the date and recipient of such information.

Establish procedures to respond to those individuals who file requests to review their own records, pursuant to Sections 45-27-11 and 45-27-12, and to cooperate in the correction of the central center records and those of contributing agencies when their accuracy has been successfully challenged either through the related contributing agencies or by court order issued on behalf of an individual.

Retain in the system the fingerprints of all law enforcement officers and part-time law enforcement officers, as those terms are defined in Section 45-6-3, and of all applicants to law enforcement agencies.

There shall be a presumption that a copy of any document submitted to the center in accordance with the provisions of Section 45-27-9 that has been processed as set forth in this chapter and subsequently certified and provided by the center to a law enforcement agency or a court shall be admissible in any proceeding without further authentication unless a person objecting to that admissibility has successfully challenged the document under the provisions of Section 45-27-11.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 15; Laws, 2006, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 436, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 484, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 45-27-8.
Mississippi Justice Information Center authorized to charge fees for services and reports.

The center, by direction of the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety, shall establish and collect fees reasonably calculated to reimburse the center for the actual cost of searching, reviewing, duplicating and mailing records or information of any kind maintained by the center and authorized for release by this chapter.

No records shall be furnished by the center which are classified as confidential by law.

All fees collected by the center pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the Criminal Information Center Special Fund hereby created in the State Treasury. Monies deposited in such fund shall be expended by the center, as authorized and appropriated by the Legislature, to defray the expenses of the center. Any revenue in the fund which is not encumbered at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse to the State General Fund but shall remain in the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 45-27-9.
Submission of data to center by criminal justice agencies; center to promptly purge records upon receipt of lawful expunction order; random review of certain agencies' or clerks' records by PEER committee; new or upgraded computerized records management systems to be formatted to Department of Justice approved format; implementation of incident-based reporting system within law enforcement agencies.

All criminal justice agencies within the state shall submit to the center an arrest card that will transmit fingerprints, descriptions, photographs (when specifically requested), and other identifying data on persons who have been lawfully arrested or taken into custody in this state for all felonies and misdemeanors as described in Section 45-27-7(2)(a). It shall be the duty of all chiefs of police, sheriffs, district attorneys, courts, court clerks, judges, parole and probation officers, wardens or other persons in charge of correctional institutions in this state to furnish the center with all data required by the rules duly promulgated under the Administrative Procedures Act to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter, and the duty of courts and court clerks to submit a disposition form for every disposition. It shall be the duty of all criminal justice agencies within the state to supply the prosecutor and the proper court with the disposition form that is attached to the physical arrest card if fingerprints were taken manually or, if fingerprints were captured digitally, the disposition form generated by the electronic fingerprint device at the time of the arrest. The PEER committee may conduct random review of the records of any agency or clerks referenced in this subsection (1) to determine whether the duties of such agencies and clerks are being fulfilled in a timely manner. The PEER committee, based on its findings, if any, shall recommend measures to ensure that the duties are more effectively carried out in a timely manner.

All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall obtain, or cause to be obtained, fingerprints according to the fingerprint system of identification established by the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, full face and profile photographs (if equipment is available) and other available identifying data, of each person arrested or taken into custody for an offense of a type designated in subsection (1) of this section, of all persons arrested or taken into custody as fugitives from justice and of all unidentified human corpses in their jurisdictions, but photographs need not be taken if it is known that photographs of the type listed, taken within the previous year, are on file. Any record taken in connection with any person arrested or taken into custody and subsequently released without charge or cleared of the offense through court proceedings shall be purged from the files of the center and destroyed upon receipt by the center of a lawful expunction order. All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrests or takings into custody which result in release without charge or subsequent exoneration from criminal liability within twenty-four (24) hours of the release or exoneration.

Fingerprints and other identifying data required to be taken under subsection (2) shall be forwarded within twenty-four (24) hours after taking for filing and classification, but the period of twenty-four (24) hours may be extended to cover any intervening holiday or weekend. Photographs taken shall be forwarded at the discretion of the agency concerned, but, if not forwarded, the fingerprint record shall be marked “Photo Available” and the photographs shall be forwarded subsequently if the center so requests.

All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrest warrants and related identifying data immediately upon determination of the fact that the warrant cannot be served for the reasons stated. If the warrant is subsequently served or withdrawn, the law enforcement agency concerned must immediately notify the center of the service or withdrawal. Also, the agency concerned must annually, no later than January 31 of each year and at other times if requested by the center, confirm all arrest warrants which continue to be outstanding. Upon receipt of a lawful expunction order, the center shall purge and destroy files of all data relating to an offense when an individual is subsequently exonerated from criminal liability of that offense. The center shall not be liable for the failure to purge, destroy or expunge any records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering the action.

All persons in charge of state correctional institutions shall obtain fingerprints, according to the fingerprint system of identification established by the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation or as otherwise directed by the center, and full face and profile photographs of all persons received on commitment to the institutions. The prints so taken shall be forwarded to the center, together with any other identifying data requested, within ten (10) days after the arrival at the institution of the person committed. At the time of release, the institution will again obtain fingerprints, as before, and forward them to the center within ten (10) days, along with any other related information requested by the center. The institution shall notify the center immediately upon the release of the person.

All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies, all court clerks, all municipal justices where they have no clerks, all justice court judges and all persons in charge of state and county probation and parole offices, shall supply the center with the information described in subsections (4) and (10) of this section on the basis of the forms and instructions for the disposition form to be supplied by the center.

All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies in this state shall furnish the center with any other identifying data required in accordance with guidelines established by the center. All law enforcement agencies and correctional institutions in this state having criminal identification files shall cooperate in providing the center with copies of the items in the files which will aid in establishing the nucleus of the state criminal identification file.

All law enforcement agencies within the state shall report to the center, in a manner prescribed by the center, all persons wanted by and all vehicles and identifiable property stolen from their jurisdictions. The report shall be made as soon as is practical after the investigating department or agency either ascertains that a vehicle or identifiable property has been stolen or obtains a warrant for an individual’s arrest or determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the individual has committed a crime. The report shall be made within a reasonable time period following the reporting department’s or agency’s determination that it has grounds to believe that a vehicle or property was stolen or that the wanted person should be arrested.

All law enforcement agencies in the state shall immediately notify the center if at any time after making a report as required by subsection (8) of this section it is determined by the reporting department or agency that a person is no longer wanted or that a vehicle or property stolen has been recovered. Furthermore, if the agency making the apprehension or recovery is not the one which made the original report, then it shall immediately notify the originating agency of the full particulars relating to the apprehension or recovery using methods prescribed by the center.

All law enforcement agencies in the state and clerks of the various courts shall promptly report to the center all instances where records of convictions of criminals are ordered expunged by courts of this state as now provided by law. The center shall promptly expunge from the files of the center and destroy all records pertaining to any convictions that are ordered expunged by the courts of this state as provided by law.

The center shall not be held liable for the failure to purge, destroy or expunge records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering the action.

Any criminal justice department or agency making an expenditure in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in any calendar year on software or programming upgrades concerning a computerized records management system or jail management system shall ensure that the new or upgraded system is formatted to Department of Justice approved XML format and that no impediments to data sharing with other agencies or departments exist in the software programming.

All law enforcement agencies within the state shall:

Implement an incident-based reporting system within the agency or department that meets the reporting requirements of the National Incident-Based Reporting System (NIBRS) of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of Investigation;

Use the system described by subparagraph (i) to submit to the center information and statistics concerning criminal offenses committed in the jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency, in a manner prescribed by the center; and

Report the information as soon as is practicable after the investigating agency or department ascertains that a qualifying crime has been committed in its jurisdiction, once the state-level NIBRS Repository is available.

No later than July 1, 2019, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature that identifies the number of local law enforcement agencies that have implemented the system described in this subsection (13).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 17; Laws, 2007, ch. 436, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 403, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 45-27-11.
Review or challenge of criminal offender records; correction of errors in records.

The center shall make a person’s criminal records available for inspection by him or his attorney upon written request. Prior to inspection, the person must submit a set of fingerprints, sign a written authorization for the records check, and provide any other identifying information required by the center. Should such person or his attorney contest the accuracy of any portion of such records, the center shall make available to such person or his attorney a copy of the contested record upon written application identifying the portion of the record contested and showing the reason for the contest of accuracy. Forms, procedures, fees, identification and other related aspects pertinent to such access may be prescribed by the center in making access available.

If an individual believes such information to be inaccurate or incomplete, he may request the original agency having custody or control of the records to purge, modify or supplement them and to so notify the center of such changes. Should the agency decline to so act or should the individual believe the agency’s decision to be otherwise unsatisfactory, the individual or his attorney may within thirty (30) days of such decision enter an appeal to the county or circuit court of the county of his residence or to such court in the county where such agency exists. The court in each such case shall conduct a de novo hearing and may order such relief as it finds to be required by law. Such appeals shall be entered in the same manner as other appeals are entered.

Should the record in question be found to be inaccurate or incomplete, the court shall order it to be appropriately expunged, modified or supplemented by an explanatory notation. Each agency or individual in the state with custody, possession or control of any such record shall promptly cause each and every copy thereof in his custody, possession or control to be altered in accordance with the court’s order. Notification of each such deletion, amendment and supplementary notation shall be promptly disseminated to any individuals or agencies to which the records in question have been communicated as well as to the individual whose records have been ordered so altered. The center shall not be held liable for the failure to modify, supplement, destroy or expunge records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering such action.

Agencies, including the center, at which criminal offender records are sought to be inspected may prescribe reasonable hours and places of inspection and may impose such additional procedures, fees or restrictions, including fingerprinting, as are reasonably necessary both to assure the record’s security, to verify the identities of those who seek to inspect them and to maintain an orderly and efficient mechanism for such access.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 45-27-12.
Dissemination of certain criminal history record information for noncriminal justice purposes.

State conviction information and arrest information which is contained in the center’s database or the nonexistence of such information in the center’s database shall be made available for the following noncriminal justice purposes:

To any local, state or federal governmental agency that requests the information for the enforcement of a local, state or federal law;

To any individual, nongovernmental entity or any employer authorized either by the subject of record in writing or by state or federal law to receive such information; and

To any federal agency or central repository in another state requesting the information for purposes authorized by law.

Information disseminated for noncriminal justice purposes as specified in this section shall be used only for the purpose for which it was made available and may not be re-disseminated.

No agency or individual shall confirm the existence or nonexistence of criminal history record information to any person or organization that would not be eligible to receive the information pursuant to this section.

Upon request for a check pursuant to this section, the nongovernmental entity or employer must provide proper identification and authorization information from the subject of the record to be checked and adhere to policies established by the center for such record checks.

Any individual or his attorney who is the subject of the record to be checked, upon positive verification of the individual’s identity, may request to review the disseminated information and shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 45-27-11. If the individual wishes to correct the record as it appears in the center’s system, the person shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 45-27-11. The right of a person to review the person’s criminal history record information shall not be used by a prospective employer or others as a means to circumvent procedures or fees for accessing records for noncriminal justice purposes.

The center may impose procedures, including the submission of fingerprints, fees or restrictions, as are reasonably necessary to assure the record’s security, to verify the identities of those who seek to inspect them, and to maintain an orderly and efficient mechanism for access. All fees shall be assessed and deposited in accordance with the provisions of Section 45-27-8.

Local agencies may release their own agency records according to their own policies.

Release of the above-described information for noncriminal justice purposes shall be made only by the center, under the limitations of this section, and such compiled records will not be released or disclosed for noncriminal justice purposes by other agencies in the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 19; Laws, 2006, ch. 347, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 45-27-13.
Penalties.

Any person who knowingly requests, obtains or attempts to obtain criminal history record information and other information maintained in the center’s network under false pretenses or who misuses criminal history record information or information maintained in the center’s network except in accordance with law or who knowingly communicates or attempts to communicate criminal history record information to any agency or person except in accordance with this chapter, or any member, officer, employee or agent of the center, or any participating agency who knowingly falsifies criminal history record information, or any records relating thereto, shall for each such offense be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both fined and imprisoned.

Any person who knowingly discloses or attempts to disclose the techniques or methods employed to ensure the security and privacy of information or data contained in criminal justice information systems, except in accordance with this chapter, shall for each such offense be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or be imprisoned for not more than two (2) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 7; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 45-27-15.
Provisions to be controlling; juvenile offenders; maintenance and dissemination of more detailed information.

In the event of conflict, this chapter shall to the extent of the conflict supersede all existing statutes which regulate, control or otherwise relate, directly or by implication, to the collection, storage and dissemination or usage of fingerprint identification, offender criminal history or any existing statute which relates directly or by implication to any other provisions of this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, this chapter shall not be understood to alter, amend or supersede the statutes and rules of law governing the collection, storage, dissemination or usage of records concerning individual juvenile offenders in which they are individually identified by name or other means.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a criminal justice agency from maintaining more detailed information than is required to be reported to the central repository. However, the dissemination of such criminal history record information is governed by federal statute.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 8; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 8, eff from and after June 30, 1983.

§ 45-27-17.
Counties, municipalities and users of network authorized to pay pro rata cost of justice information center.

All boards of supervisors, municipal authorities of the state and other users of the network are hereby authorized to appropriate and pay, in their discretion, to the Department of Public Safety such sum as may be assessed against said county or municipality or user agency as their pro rata cost of the justice information system and Mississippi Justice Information Center.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 555, § 10; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 381, § 9; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 45-27-19.
Exemption of records.

Unless specifically authorized by law, records maintained by the center shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

Intelligence and investigative files maintained by law enforcement shall be kept separate from criminal history record information and shall be exempt from dissemination under the provisions of this chapter and the Mississippi Public Records Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 22, eff from and after July 2, 2001.

§ 45-27-21.
Database of all expunction and nonadjudication orders created; accessibility to database.

A certified copy of every expunction and nonadjudication order shall be sent by the circuit clerk to the Mississippi Criminal Information Center where it shall be maintained in a separate confidential database accessible only upon written request by a district attorney, a county prosecuting attorney, a municipal court prosecuting attorney, the Attorney General of Mississippi and the Mississippi Law Enforcement Standards and Training Board. Any criminal conviction which has been expunged or nonadjudicated may be used for the purpose of determining habitual offender status and for the use of the Mississippi Law Enforcement Standards and Training Board in giving or retaining law enforcement certification, and to ensure that a person is only eligible for first-offender status one (1) time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 490, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.